Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.150

Payment on separation from service.

(1) Any firefighter who has served twenty years or more and who shall resign or be dismissed, shall have the option of receiving all his or her contributions plus earned interest compounded semiannually, or a monthly pension in the amount of his or her average monthly salary times the number of years of service rendered, times one and one-half percent. Payment of such pension shall commence at the time of severance from the fire department, or at the age of fifty-five years, whichever shall be later. The firefighter shall have sixty days from the severance date to elect which option he or she will take. In the event he or she fails to exercise his or her right of election then he or she shall receive the amount of his or her contributions plus accrued compounded interest. In the event he or she elects such pension, but dies before attaining the age of fifty-five, his widow or her widower, or if he leaves no widow or she leaves no widower, then his or her child or children shall receive only his or her contribution, plus accrued compounded interest. In the event he or she elects to take a pension and dies after attaining the age of fifty-five, his widow or her widower, or if he leaves no widow or she leaves no widower, then child or children shall receive his or her contributions, plus accrued compounded interest, less the amount of pension payments made to such firefighter during his or her lifetime.

(2) Any firefighter who shall have served for a period of less than twenty years, and shall resign or be dismissed, shall be paid the amount of his or her contributions, plus accrued compounded interest.

[ 2007 c 218 s 31; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 65; 1959 c 5 s 9; 1957 c 82 s 9. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.